Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 22

Bees and Apiaries

Effective Dates. Acts 1977, No. 161, § 9: July 1, 1977.

2-22-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abandoned apiary” means an apiary to which the owner or operator fails to provide such reasonable and adequate attention to each hive during the year as to jeopardize the welfare of neighboring colonies;

“Apiary” means any place where one (1) or more colonies of bees are kept;

“Apiary equipment” means hives, supers, frames, veils, gloves, or any other equipment used in the handling and manipulation of bees, honey, wax, and hives;

“Appliances” means any apparatus, tools, machines, or other devices used in the handling and manipulation of bees, honey, wax, and hives. The term includes containers of honey and wax which may be used in an apiary or in transporting bees and their products and apiary supplies;

“Bee disease” means American and European foulbrood, sacbrood, bee paralysis, or any other disease or abnormal condition of the egg, larval, pupal, or adult stages of bees;

“Bees” means any stage of the common honeybee, Apis mellifera;

“Colony” means the bees in any hive including queens, workers, and drones;

“Director” means the Director of the State Plant Board;

“Hive” means a frame hive, box hive, box, barrel, logs, gum skep, or any other receptacle or container, natural or artificial, or any part thereof, which may be used as a domicile for bees;

“Nucleus” means any division or portion of a hive that contains comb;

“Package” means an indefinite number of bees, in a bee-tight container, with or without a queen, without comb;

“Pollination” means the use of bees for the transfer of pollen in the production of agricultural crops;

“Section head” means the head of the Apiary Section of the Division of Plant Industries; and

“State Apiarist” means the Director of the Division of Plant Industries of the State Plant Board.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1726.

2-22-102. Penalty.

Any person violating the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor and shall be punished accordingly.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1730.

Cross References. Class “C” misdemeanors, §§5-1-107,5-4-201,5-4-401.

2-22-103. Prohibited acts.

No person shall sell, offer for sale, give away, or otherwise transfer ownership of any bees, colony of bees, or queen bees without first receiving from the State Plant Board a certificate of health issued not more than six (6) months before disposition.

A copy of the certificate shall be issued by the seller or given to the purchaser or person receiving the colony at the time of delivery.

It is unlawful for any person to give false information or incomplete information in any matter pertaining to this chapter or to resist, impede, or hinder the apiary inspector in the discharge of his or her duties.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 4; 1979, No. 149, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1728.

2-22-104. Administration.

The State Plant Board is vested with the authority to carry out the provisions of this chapter through the Director of the State Plant Board, State Apiarist, section head, and deputies.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1725.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1975, No. 455, § 2, provided that, effective July 1, 1975, the State Apiary Board and all its powers, etc., were transferred to the Department of Commerce by a Type 2 transfer and that the only function of the board would be to serve in an advisory capacity to the department in matters relating to beekeeping.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 1, provided, in part, that the State Apiary Board was abolished and that all its records, etc., were transferred to the State Plant Board for use in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

2-22-105. Rules.

The State Plant Board may promulgate such rules, not inconsistent with this chapter, as it shall deem necessary for the proper enforcement of this chapter.

Rules shall be promulgated, issued, and enforced in accordance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

If an abandoned apiary is found upon inspection to be diseased, the board shall cause it to be immediately destroyed by burning.

An apiary may be considered abandoned only after reasonable attempts have been made to determine ownership.

Attempts to determine ownership are to at least include the questioning of the owner, lessee, or renter of the land on which the apiary is discovered.

After inspection of infected bees or fixtures or after handling diseased bees and before leaving the premises or proceeding to any other apiary, the apiary inspector shall take such measures as shall prevent the spread of the disease by infected material adhering to his or her person or clothing or to any tools or appliances used by him or her which have come in contact with infected materials.

Upon request, additional inspections shall be made by the inspector of bees, colonies of bees, queen bees and their attendants, or hives, supers, or other equipment used in bee culture.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1730.

2-22-106. Enforcement.

(1)For the enforcement of this chapter, the apiary inspector shall have, where any apiary is located or any bees, combs, or apiary appliances are kept, the authority to enter upon any private or public premises with right of access, ingress, and egress for the purpose of ascertaining the existence of the disease known as American foulbrood or European foulbrood or any other disease which is infectious or contagious and injurious to bees in their egg, larval, pupal, or adult stages.

(A)Before exercising that authority, the inspector must afford the beekeeper the opportunity to be present during the inspection by serving notice of the date and time of inspection at least five (5) days before the inspection.

The five-day period may be abbreviated upon the mutual consent of the inspector and the beekeeper.

Beekeepers aggrieved by the actions of an inspector may appeal the inspector's action to the State Plant Board at the board's next meeting.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 4; 1979, No. 149, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1728.

2-22-107. Inspections.

(1)Whenever an apiary has been inspected and found apparently free from American foulbrood or other dangerous, contagious, or infectious bee diseases, and all other provisions of this chapter have been complied with, a certificate of inspection shall be issued.

The certificate of inspection shall be valid for a period of one (1) year following the date of its issuance.

A valid certificate of inspection shall be deemed as a blanket permit to move the hives from place to place within the state.

Should, upon inspection or laboratory analysis, any of the diseases described in §2-22-106(a) be determined to exist in an apiary, it shall be the duty of the State Plant Board to cause the colony to be treated or disinfected or to destroy it, or cause it to be destroyed, by fire, including the hives, frames, honey, wax, and brood.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 4; 1979, No. 149, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1728.

2-22-108. Standards for inspectors.

The State Plant Board shall establish minimum competency standards for persons to be employed as apiary inspectors. These requirements are to include demonstrated ability to properly handle hives and bees in addition to proficient performance on a written test measuring knowledge pertinent to the job of inspector.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 4; 1979, No. 149, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1728.

2-22-109. Duties of persons engaged in beekeeping.

It is the duty of all persons engaged in beekeeping to provide movable frames in all hives used by them to contain bees and to cause the bees in the hives to construct brood combs in the frames so that any of the frames may be removed from the hive without injuring other combs in the hive.

Beekeepers shall change newly acquired bees from their natural habitat to hives as soon as possible, but in no case shall a period of more than twelve (12) months elapse between the date of acquiring new bees and transferring them to hives.

Immediately upon detection of disease, anyone keeping bees shall treat and disinfect, or burn and bury in places where they shall remain undisturbed, combs and frames taken from diseased colonies, or, until salvaged, combs and frames shall be placed in tight receptacles so constructed that it is impossible for bees to gain access to combs or for honey or any other liquid to leak out where bees are able to gain access to it.

Anyone exposing combs, honey, frames, empty hives, covers or bottom-boards, or tools, or other appliances contaminated by infected material from diseased colonies shall, upon conviction, be punished as provided in this chapter.

Effective Dates. Acts 1991, No. 1024, §§ 3, 7: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the effective administration of this act that the provisions hereof become effective on July 1, 1991; that without an emergency clause, this act might not become effective until after July 1, 1991. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer [sic], it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Am. Jur. 4 Am. Jur. 2d, Alt. Desp. Res., § 157.

Ark. L. Notes.

Looney, Bad Seeds Make Bad Law: Is the Seed Arbitration Act An Obstacle to Recovery in Defective Seed Cases in Arkansas?, 1994 Ark. L. Notes 53.

C.J.S. 6 C.J.S., Arbit., § 1 et seq.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 4; 1979, No. 149, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1728.

2-22-110. Registration by beekeepers.

(1)(A)A person owning, leasing, or possessing bees within ten (10) days after coming into ownership or possession of bees or before moving bees from outside the State of Arkansas, shall file with the State Plant Board an application for registration.

The application shall set forth the exact location by legal description of the premises, together with the name of the owner or possessor of the apiary, the number of colonies of bees in each apiary owned by him or her or in his or her possession or under his or her control, together with such other information as may be required by the board.

The beekeeper may register one (1) location for each ten (10) colonies for the first one thousand (1,000) colonies and may register one (1) location for each twenty (20) colonies thereafter.

A new registration is required when any significant change occurs in the location or operation of the beekeeper.

All applications for registration shall be approved or rejected by the board so as to effectuate compliance with this chapter or rules promulgated under this section.

(1)No person can place bees on property other than his or her own within three (3) miles of a previously registered area without the written permission of the registrant.

Upon written complaint made to the board by any beekeeper or any landowner whose land is in the registered area that the registrant or any other person claiming prior bee pasturage rights is not properly covering the area so registered, then the board shall be authorized to permit the placing in such area of other bees or bee yards as, in its judgment, shall be sufficient.

(1)(A)Nonresidents of this state who desire to locate their colonies of bees in Arkansas shall register their bees and the locations they desire as required in subsection (a) of this section.

Registration shall be required annually.

If a nonresident beekeeper fails to place his or her bees in an area registered by him or her during the registration period, the beekeeper shall forfeit his or her rights to that area and shall not be allowed to apply for that area until one (1) year after the forfeiture.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 3; 1979, No. 149, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1727.

2-22-111. Transporting of bees.

(1)All bees in used hives or other apiary equipment which may be brought into the state from other states or other countries must be accompanied by a certificate of health issued by the official inspector of the state or country where they had been located.

The transportation of bees in used hives or other apiary equipment into this state without a certificate of health by any person or by common carriers is expressly prohibited.

The certificate of health shall certify to the apparent freedom from foulbrood or any other contagious or infectious bee disease and shall be based on actual inspection of bees and material within ninety (90) days of the date of shipment.

(1)A person transporting bees within the state to a location not previously approved shall notify the State Plant Board of the action at least twenty (20) days before the move.

(A)Under emergency conditions such as fires, crop dusting, and natural disasters, the bees may be moved without prior notice if the board is notified within five (5) days of the move and informed of the circumstances necessitating the emergency move.

No notification shall be required for the movement of disease-free bees between previously registered locations.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 5; 1979, No. 149, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1729.

2-22-112. Quarantine.

All apiaries, bees, bee equipment, bee products, buildings, premises, and appliances where or on which American or European foulbrood is known to exist are declared to be under quarantine.

(1)The removal of any and all bees, queen bees, bee products, colonies, nuclei, combs and apiary appliances, and bee fixtures is prohibited except under such cases as the State Plant Board may permit or approve.

The quarantines shall exist until the board shall determine and declare the premises or material is apparently free from American or European foulbrood.

The imposed quarantine shall cease to be in effect if the board has not verified the existence of American or European foulbrood within thirty (30) days after appeal by the beekeeper.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 161, § 4; 1979, No. 149, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 78-1728.